it: Varietà di curry: Biryani; Butter Chicken; Curry caraibico; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Curry giapponese; Golden Curry giapponese; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Curry dello Sri Lanka; Verde thailandese; Rosso thailandese; Giallo thailandese; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Altro
ru: Сорт карри: Бирьяни; Баттер-чикен; Карибское карри; Коломбо; Дансак; Джалфрези; Японское карри; Японское золотое карри; Кацу; Корма; Курма; Лакса; Мадрас; Массаман; Пананг; Ренданг; Роган Джош; Шри-ланкийское карри; Тайское зеленое; Тайское красное; Тайское желтое; Тикка-масала; Том ям; Виндалу; Другое
ja: カレーの種類: ビリヤニ; バターチキン; カリビアンカレー; コロンボ; ダンサク; ジャルフレージ; 日本のカレー; 日本のゴールデンカレー; カツ; コルマ; クルマ; ラクサ; マドラス; マッサマン; パネーン; ルンダン; ローガンジョシュ; スリランカカレー; タイグリーン; タイレッド; タイイエロー; ティッカマサラ; トムヤム; ビンダルー; その他
pt-PT: Variedade de caril: Biryani; Butter Chicken; Caril caribenho; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Caril japonês; Caril dourado japonês; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Caril do Sri Lanka; Caril verde tailandês; Caril vermelho tailandês; Caril amarelo tailandês; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Outro
sl-SI: Sorta karija: Biryani; Piščanec v masleni omaki; Karibski kari; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japonski kari; Japonski zlati kari; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Šrilanški kari; Tajski zeleni kari; Tajski rdeči kari; Tajski rumeni kari; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Drugo
pl: Odmiana curry: Biryani; Butter Chicken; Karaibskie curry; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japońskie curry; Japońskie golden curry; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Curry ze Sri Lanki; Zielone tajskie; Czerwone tajskie; Żółte tajskie; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Inne
pt-BR: Variedade de curry: Biryani; Butter Chicken; Caril caribenho; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Caril japonês; Golden Curry japonês; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Caril do Sri Lanka; Tailandês verde; Tailandês vermelho; Tailandês amarelo; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Outro
nl: Curryvariëteit: Biryani; Butter chicken; Caribische curry; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japanse curry; Japanse golden curry; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan josh; Sri Lankaanse curry; Thaise groene curry; Thaise rode curry; Thaise gele curry; Tikka masala; Tom yum; Vindaloo; Overig
da: Karryvariant: Biryani; Butter chicken; Caribisk karry; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japansk karry; Japansk gylden karry; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan josh; Srilankansk karry; Grøn thai-karry; Rød thai-karry; Gul thai-karry; Tikka masala; Tom yum; Vindaloo; Andet
bg-BG: Разновидности къри: Биряни; Бътър чикън; Карибско къри; Коломбо; Дансак; Джалфрези; Японско къри; Японско златно къри; Кацу; Корма; Курма; Лакса; Мадрас; Масаман; Пананг; Ренданг; Роган джош; Шриланкско къри; Тайландско зелено; Тайландско червено; Тайландско жълто; Тика масала; Том ям; Виндалу; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta curryja: Biryani; Butter Chicken; Karipski curry; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japanski curry; Japanski Golden Curry; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Šrilančanski curry; Tajlandski zeleni; Tajlandski crveni; Tajlandski žuti; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Ostalo
hu: Curry fajtája: Biryani; Vajas csirke; Karibi curry; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japán curry; Japanese Golden curry; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Srí Lanka-i curry; Thai zöld; Thai vörös; Thai sárga; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Egyéb
de: Currysorte: Biryani; Butter Chicken; Karibisches Curry; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japanisches Curry; Japanisches Goldenes Curry; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Sri-lankisches Curry; Grünes Thai-Curry; Rotes Thai-Curry; Gelbes Thai-Curry; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Sonstige
fr: Variété de curry: Biryani; Poulet au beurre; Curry caribéen; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Curry japonais; Golden Curry japonais; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Curry sri-lankais; Vert thaï; Rouge thaï; Jaune thaï; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Autre
nb: Karrivariant: Biryani; Butter chicken; Karibisk karri; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japansk karri; Japansk golden curry; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan josh; Srilankisk karri; Grønn thai; Rød thai; Gul thai; Tikka masala; Tom yum; Vindaloo; Annet
en: Curry variety: Biryani; Butter Chicken; Caribbean Curry; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japanese Curry; Japanese Golden Curry; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Sri Lankan Curry; Thai Green; Thai Red; Thai Yellow; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Other
tr: Köri çeşidi: Biryani; Tereyağlı tavuk; Karayip körisi; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japon körisi; Japon altın körisi; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan josh; Sri Lanka körisi; Tayland yeşil; Tayland kırmızı; Tayland sarı; Tikka masala; Tom yum; Vindaloo; Diğer
es: Variedad de curry: Biryani; Butter chicken; Curry caribeño; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Curry japonés; Golden curry japonés; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madrás; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan josh; Curry de Sri Lanka; Verde tailandés; Rojo tailandés; Amarillo tailandés; Tikka masala; Tom yum; Vindaloo; Otro
sv: Currysort: Biryani; Butter chicken; Karibisk curry; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japansk curry; Japansk golden curry; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan josh; Lankesisk curry; Thailändsk grön; Thailändsk röd; Thailändsk gul; Tikka masala; Tom yum; Vindaloo; Övrigt
ko: 카레 종류: 비리야니; 버터 치킨; 카리브해식 카레; 콜롬보; 단삭; 잘프레지; 일본식 카레; 일본식 골든 카레; 카츠; 코르마; 쿠르마; 락사; 마드라스; 마사만; 파냉; 렌당; 로간 조쉬; 스리랑카 카레; 태국식 그린 카레; 태국식 레드 카레; 태국식 옐로 카레; 티카 마살라; 똠얌; 빈달루; 기타
ro-RO: Soiul de curry: Biryani; Butter Chicken; Curry caraibean; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Curry japonez; Curry japonez Golden; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Curry srilankez; Thai Green; Thai Red; Thai Yellow; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Altele
cs: Druh kari: Biryani; Butter Chicken; Karibské kari; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japonské kari; Japonské kari Golden; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Srílanské kari; Thajské zelené; Thajské červené; Thajské žluté; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Ostatní
lt-LT: Kario tipas: Biryani; Sviestinė vištiena; Karibų karis; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japoniškas karis; Japoniškas „Golden“ karis; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madraso; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Šri Lankos karis; Tailando žaliasis; Tailando raudonasis; Tailando geltonasis; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Kita
fi: Currytyyppi: Biryani; Butter chicken; Karibialainen curry; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japanilainen curry; Japanilainen Golden curry; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan josh; Srilankalainen curry; Vihreä thai-curry; Punainen thai-curry; Keltainen thai-curry; Tikka masala; Tom yum; Vindaloo; Muu
sk-SK: Odroda kari: Biryani; Butter Chicken; Karibské kari; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Japonské kari; Japonské zlaté kari; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Srílanské kari; Thajské zelené; Thajské červené; Thajské žlté; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Iné
vi: Loại cà ri: Biryani; Gà bơ (Butter Chicken); Cà ri Caribe; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Cà ri Nhật; Cà ri vàng Nhật Bản; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Cà ri Sri Lanka; Cà ri xanh Thái; Cà ri đỏ Thái; Cà ri vàng Thái; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Khác
zh-CN: 咖喱品种: 印度香饭; 黄油鸡; 加勒比咖喱; 哥伦布咖喱; 丹萨克咖喱; 贾法雷吉咖喱; 日本咖喱; 日本黄金咖喱; 炸肉排; 库尔玛咖喱; 库尔玛咖喱; 叻沙; 马德拉斯咖喱; 马沙曼咖喱; 帕南咖喱; 仁当咖喱; 罗根乔什咖喱; 斯里兰卡咖喱; 泰式绿咖喱; 泰式红咖喱; 泰式黄咖喱; 提卡玛萨拉咖喱; 冬阴功; 温达卢咖喱; 其他
zh-TW: 咖哩種類: 印度香飯; 奶油咖哩雞; 加勒比海咖哩; 哥倫坡咖哩; 丹薩克咖哩; 賈弗列茲咖哩; 日式咖哩; 日式金牌咖哩; 炸豬排咖哩; 科爾瑪咖哩; 庫爾瑪咖哩; 叻沙; 馬德拉斯咖哩; 馬沙曼咖哩; 帕能咖哩; 仁當咖哩; 羅根喬什咖哩; 斯里蘭卡咖哩; 泰式綠咖哩; 泰式紅咖哩; 泰式黃咖哩; 提卡馬沙拉咖哩; 冬蔭功; 溫達盧咖哩; 其他
th: ประเภทของแกงกะหรี่: ข้าวหมก; แกงไก่เนยอินเดีย; แกงกะหรี่แคริบเบียน; โคลัมโบ; แกงดันซัค; จาลเฟรซี; แกงกะหรี่ญี่ปุ่น; แกงกะหรี่โกลเด้นญี่ปุ่น; คัตสึ; กุรุหม่า; คุรมา; ลักซา; แกงมัทราส; มัสมั่น; พะแนง; เรนดัง; โรแกนจอช; แกงกะหรี่ศรีลังกา; แกงเขียวหวาน; แกงเผ็ด; แกงกะหรี่ไทย; ทิกก้ามาซาลา; ต้มยำ; วินดาลู; อื่นๆ
el: Ποικιλία κάρι: Μπιριάνι; Butter Chicken; Κάρυ Καραϊβικής; Colombo; Dhansak; Jalfrezi; Ιαπωνικό κάρυ; Ιαπωνικό Golden Curry; Katsu; Korma; Kurma; Laksa; Madras; Massaman; Panang; Rendang; Rogan Josh; Κάρυ Σρι Λάνκας; Πράσινο ταϊλανδέζικο; Κόκκινο ταϊλανδέζικο; Κίτρινο ταϊλανδέζικο; Tikka Masala; Tom Yum; Vindaloo; Άλλο